Utah statutes.
31A-8-202.   Corporate name -- Office -- Registered agent.

(1)  Sections 16-10a-402, 16-10a-403, and 42-2-5 apply to the reservation and registration of the corporate name in domestic health maintenance organizations.  Reservation and registration fees under Section 31A-3-103 apply.

(2)  The location of an organization's principal office and the existence of a registered agent are governed by Title 16, Chapter 17, Model Registered Agents Act.

